Illinois, session 104th, SB2896.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-74.4-3 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-74.4-3)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-74.4-3)7    Sec. 11-74.4-3. Definitions. The following terms, wherever 8used or referred to in this Division 74.4 shall have the 9following respective meanings, unless in any case a different 10meaning clearly appears from the context.11    (a) For any redevelopment project area that has been 12designated pursuant to this Section by an ordinance adopted 13prior to November 1, 1999 (the effective date of Public Act 1491-478), "blighted area" shall have the meaning set forth in 15this Section prior to that date.16    On and after November 1, 1999, "blighted area" means any 17improved or vacant area within the boundaries of a 18redevelopment project area located within the territorial 19limits of the municipality where:20        (1) If improved, industrial, commercial, and 21    residential buildings or improvements are detrimental to 22    the public safety, health, or welfare because of a 23    combination of 5 or more of the following factors, each of   SB2896- 2 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    which is (i) present, with that presence documented, to a 2    meaningful extent so that a municipality may reasonably 3    find that the factor is clearly present within the intent 4    of the Act and (ii) reasonably distributed throughout the 5    improved part of the redevelopment project area:6            (A) Dilapidation. An advanced state of disrepair 7        or neglect of necessary repairs to the primary 8        structural components of buildings or improvements in 9        such a combination that a documented building 10        condition analysis determines that major repair is 11        required or the defects are so serious and so 12        extensive that the buildings must be removed.13            (B) Obsolescence. The condition or process of 14        falling into disuse. Structures have become ill-suited 15        for the original use.16            (C) Deterioration. With respect to buildings, 17        defects including, but not limited to, major defects 18        in the secondary building components such as doors, 19        windows, porches, gutters and downspouts, and fascia. 20        With respect to surface improvements, that the 21        condition of roadways, alleys, curbs, gutters, 22        sidewalks, off-street parking, and surface storage 23        areas evidence deterioration, including, but not 24        limited to, surface cracking, crumbling, potholes, 25        depressions, loose paving material, and weeds 26        protruding through paved surfaces.  SB2896- 3 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1            (D) Presence of structures below minimum code 2        standards. All structures that do not meet the 3        standards of zoning, subdivision, building, fire, and 4        other governmental codes applicable to property, but 5        not including housing and property maintenance codes.6            (E) Illegal use of individual structures. The use 7        of structures in violation of applicable federal, 8        State, or local laws, exclusive of those applicable to 9        the presence of structures below minimum code 10        standards.11            (F) Excessive vacancies. The presence of buildings 12        that are unoccupied or under-utilized and that 13        represent an adverse influence on the area because of 14        the frequency, extent, or duration of the vacancies.15            (G) Lack of ventilation, light, or sanitary 16        facilities. The absence of adequate ventilation for 17        light or air circulation in spaces or rooms without 18        windows, or that require the removal of dust, odor, 19        gas, smoke, or other noxious airborne materials. 20        Inadequate natural light and ventilation means the 21        absence of skylights or windows for interior spaces or 22        rooms and improper window sizes and amounts by room 23        area to window area ratios. Inadequate sanitary 24        facilities refers to the absence or inadequacy of 25        garbage storage and enclosure, bathroom facilities, 26        hot water and kitchens, and structural inadequacies   SB2896- 4 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1        preventing ingress and egress to and from all rooms 2        and units within a building.3            (H) Inadequate utilities. Underground and overhead 4        utilities such as storm sewers and storm drainage, 5        sanitary sewers, water lines, and gas, telephone, and 6        electrical services that are shown to be inadequate. 7        Inadequate utilities are those that are: (i) of 8        insufficient capacity to serve the uses in the 9        redevelopment project area, (ii) deteriorated, 10        antiquated, obsolete, or in disrepair, or (iii) 11        lacking within the redevelopment project area.12            (I) Excessive land coverage and overcrowding of 13        structures and community facilities. The 14        over-intensive use of property and the crowding of 15        buildings and accessory facilities onto a site. 16        Examples of problem conditions warranting the 17        designation of an area as one exhibiting excessive 18        land coverage are: (i) the presence of buildings 19        either improperly situated on parcels or located on 20        parcels of inadequate size and shape in relation to 21        present-day standards of development for health and 22        safety and (ii) the presence of multiple buildings on 23        a single parcel. For there to be a finding of excessive 24        land coverage, these parcels must exhibit one or more 25        of the following conditions: insufficient provision 26        for light and air within or around buildings,   SB2896- 5 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1        increased threat of spread of fire due to the close 2        proximity of buildings, lack of adequate or proper 3        access to a public right-of-way, lack of reasonably 4        required off-street parking, or inadequate provision 5        for loading and service.6            (J) Deleterious land use or layout. The existence 7        of incompatible land-use relationships, buildings 8        occupied by inappropriate mixed-uses, or uses 9        considered to be noxious, offensive, or unsuitable for 10        the surrounding area.11            (K) Environmental clean-up. The proposed 12        redevelopment project area has incurred Illinois 13        Environmental Protection Agency or United States 14        Environmental Protection Agency remediation costs for, 15        or a study conducted by an independent consultant 16        recognized as having expertise in environmental 17        remediation has determined a need for, the clean-up of 18        hazardous waste, hazardous substances, or underground 19        storage tanks required by State or federal law, 20        provided that the remediation costs constitute a 21        material impediment to the development or 22        redevelopment of the redevelopment project area.23            (L) Lack of community planning. The proposed 24        redevelopment project area was developed prior to or 25        without the benefit or guidance of a community plan. 26        This means that the development occurred prior to the   SB2896- 6 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1        adoption by the municipality of a comprehensive or 2        other community plan or that the plan was not followed 3        at the time of the area's development. This factor 4        must be documented by evidence of adverse or 5        incompatible land-use relationships, inadequate street 6        layout, improper subdivision, parcels of inadequate 7        shape and size to meet contemporary development 8        standards, or other evidence demonstrating an absence 9        of effective community planning.10            (M) The total equalized assessed value of the 11        proposed redevelopment project area has declined for 3 12        of the last 5 calendar years prior to the year in which 13        the redevelopment project area is designated or is 14        increasing at an annual rate that is less than the 15        balance of the municipality for 3 of the last 5 16        calendar years for which information is available or 17        is increasing at an annual rate that is less than the 18        Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published 19        by the United States Department of Labor or successor 20        agency for 3 of the last 5 calendar years prior to the 21        year in which the redevelopment project area is 22        designated.23        (2) If vacant, the sound growth of the redevelopment 24    project area is impaired by a combination of 2 or more of 25    the following factors, each of which is (i) present, with 26    that presence documented, to a meaningful extent so that a   SB2896- 7 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    municipality may reasonably find that the factor is 2    clearly present within the intent of the Act and (ii) 3    reasonably distributed throughout the vacant part of the 4    redevelopment project area to which it pertains:5            (A) Obsolete platting of vacant land that results 6        in parcels of limited or narrow size or configurations 7        of parcels of irregular size or shape that would be 8        difficult to develop on a planned basis and in a manner 9        compatible with contemporary standards and 10        requirements, or platting that failed to create 11        rights-of-ways for streets or alleys or that created 12        inadequate right-of-way widths for streets, alleys, or 13        other public rights-of-way or that omitted easements 14        for public utilities.15            (B) Diversity of ownership of parcels of vacant 16        land sufficient in number to retard or impede the 17        ability to assemble the land for development.18            (C) Tax and special assessment delinquencies exist 19        or the property has been the subject of tax sales under 20        the Property Tax Code within the last 5 years.21            (D) Deterioration of structures or site 22        improvements in neighboring areas adjacent to the 23        vacant land.24            (E) The area has incurred Illinois Environmental 25        Protection Agency or United States Environmental 26        Protection Agency remediation costs for, or a study   SB2896- 8 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1        conducted by an independent consultant recognized as 2        having expertise in environmental remediation has 3        determined a need for, the clean-up of hazardous 4        waste, hazardous substances, or underground storage 5        tanks required by State or federal law, provided that 6        the remediation costs constitute a material impediment 7        to the development or redevelopment of the 8        redevelopment project area.9            (F) The total equalized assessed value of the 10        proposed redevelopment project area has declined for 3 11        of the last 5 calendar years prior to the year in which 12        the redevelopment project area is designated or is 13        increasing at an annual rate that is less than the 14        balance of the municipality for 3 of the last 5 15        calendar years for which information is available or 16        is increasing at an annual rate that is less than the 17        Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published 18        by the United States Department of Labor or successor 19        agency for 3 of the last 5 calendar years prior to the 20        year in which the redevelopment project area is 21        designated.22        (3) If vacant, the sound growth of the redevelopment 23    project area is impaired by one of the following factors 24    that (i) is present, with that presence documented, to a 25    meaningful extent so that a municipality may reasonably 26    find that the factor is clearly present within the intent   SB2896- 9 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    of the Act and (ii) is reasonably distributed throughout 2    the vacant part of the redevelopment project area to which 3    it pertains:4            (A) The area consists of one or more unused 5        quarries, mines, or strip mine ponds.6            (B) The area consists of unused rail yards, rail 7        tracks, or railroad rights-of-way.8            (C) The area, prior to its designation, is subject 9        to (i) chronic flooding that adversely impacts on real 10        property in the area as certified by a registered 11        professional engineer or appropriate regulatory agency 12        or (ii) surface water that discharges from all or a 13        part of the area and contributes to flooding within 14        the same watershed, but only if the redevelopment 15        project provides for facilities or improvements to 16        contribute to the alleviation of all or part of the 17        flooding.18            (D) The area consists of an unused or illegal 19        disposal site containing earth, stone, building 20        debris, or similar materials that were removed from 21        construction, demolition, excavation, or dredge sites.22            (E) Prior to November 1, 1999, the area is not less 23        than 50 nor more than 100 acres and 75% of which is 24        vacant (notwithstanding that the area has been used 25        for commercial agricultural purposes within 5 years 26        prior to the designation of the redevelopment project   SB2896- 10 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1        area), and the area meets at least one of the factors 2        itemized in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the area 3        has been designated as a town or village center by 4        ordinance or comprehensive plan adopted prior to 5        January 1, 1982, and the area has not been developed 6        for that designated purpose.7            (F) The area qualified as a blighted improved area 8        immediately prior to becoming vacant, unless there has 9        been substantial private investment in the immediately 10        surrounding area.11    (b) For any redevelopment project area that has been 12designated pursuant to this Section by an ordinance adopted 13prior to November 1, 1999 (the effective date of Public Act 1491-478), "conservation area" shall have the meaning set forth 15in this Section prior to that date.16    On and after November 1, 1999, "conservation area" means 17any improved area within the boundaries of a redevelopment 18project area located within the territorial limits of the 19municipality in which 50% or more of the structures in the area 20have an age of 35 years or more. Such an area is not yet a 21blighted area but because of a combination of 3 or more of the 22following factors is detrimental to the public safety, health, 23morals or welfare and such an area may become a blighted area:24        (1) Dilapidation. An advanced state of disrepair or 25    neglect of necessary repairs to the primary structural 26    components of buildings or improvements in such a   SB2896- 11 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    combination that a documented building condition analysis 2    determines that major repair is required or the defects 3    are so serious and so extensive that the buildings must be 4    removed.5        (2) Obsolescence. The condition or process of falling 6    into disuse. Structures have become ill-suited for the 7    original use.8        (3) Deterioration. With respect to buildings, defects 9    including, but not limited to, major defects in the 10    secondary building components such as doors, windows, 11    porches, gutters and downspouts, and fascia. With respect 12    to surface improvements, that the condition of roadways, 13    alleys, curbs, gutters, sidewalks, off-street parking, and 14    surface storage areas evidence deterioration, including, 15    but not limited to, surface cracking, crumbling, potholes, 16    depressions, loose paving material, and weeds protruding 17    through paved surfaces.18        (4) Presence of structures below minimum code 19    standards. All structures that do not meet the standards 20    of zoning, subdivision, building, fire, and other 21    governmental codes applicable to property, but not 22    including housing and property maintenance codes.23        (5) Illegal use of individual structures. The use of 24    structures in violation of applicable federal, State, or 25    local laws, exclusive of those applicable to the presence 26    of structures below minimum code standards.  SB2896- 12 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1        (6) Excessive vacancies. The presence of buildings 2    that are unoccupied or under-utilized and that represent 3    an adverse influence on the area because of the frequency, 4    extent, or duration of the vacancies.5        (7) Lack of ventilation, light, or sanitary 6    facilities. The absence of adequate ventilation for light 7    or air circulation in spaces or rooms without windows, or 8    that require the removal of dust, odor, gas, smoke, or 9    other noxious airborne materials. Inadequate natural light 10    and ventilation means the absence or inadequacy of 11    skylights or windows for interior spaces or rooms and 12    improper window sizes and amounts by room area to window 13    area ratios. Inadequate sanitary facilities refers to the 14    absence or inadequacy of garbage storage and enclosure, 15    bathroom facilities, hot water and kitchens, and 16    structural inadequacies preventing ingress and egress to 17    and from all rooms and units within a building.18        (8) Inadequate utilities. Underground and overhead 19    utilities such as storm sewers and storm drainage, 20    sanitary sewers, water lines, and gas, telephone, and 21    electrical services that are shown to be inadequate. 22    Inadequate utilities are those that are: (i) of 23    insufficient capacity to serve the uses in the 24    redevelopment project area, (ii) deteriorated, antiquated, 25    obsolete, or in disrepair, or (iii) lacking within the 26    redevelopment project area.  SB2896- 13 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1        (9) Excessive land coverage and overcrowding of 2    structures and community facilities. The over-intensive 3    use of property and the crowding of buildings and 4    accessory facilities onto a site. Examples of problem 5    conditions warranting the designation of an area as one 6    exhibiting excessive land coverage are: the presence of 7    buildings either improperly situated on parcels or located 8    on parcels of inadequate size and shape in relation to 9    present-day standards of development for health and safety 10    and the presence of multiple buildings on a single parcel. 11    For there to be a finding of excessive land coverage, 12    these parcels must exhibit one or more of the following 13    conditions: insufficient provision for light and air 14    within or around buildings, increased threat of spread of 15    fire due to the close proximity of buildings, lack of 16    adequate or proper access to a public right-of-way, lack 17    of reasonably required off-street parking, or inadequate 18    provision for loading and service.19        (10) Deleterious land use or layout. The existence of 20    incompatible land-use relationships, buildings occupied by 21    inappropriate mixed-uses, or uses considered to be 22    noxious, offensive, or unsuitable for the surrounding 23    area.24        (11) Lack of community planning. The proposed 25    redevelopment project area was developed prior to or 26    without the benefit or guidance of a community plan. This   SB2896- 14 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    means that the development occurred prior to the adoption 2    by the municipality of a comprehensive or other community 3    plan or that the plan was not followed at the time of the 4    area's development. This factor must be documented by 5    evidence of adverse or incompatible land-use 6    relationships, inadequate street layout, improper 7    subdivision, parcels of inadequate shape and size to meet 8    contemporary development standards, or other evidence 9    demonstrating an absence of effective community planning.10        (12) The area has incurred Illinois Environmental 11    Protection Agency or United States Environmental 12    Protection Agency remediation costs for, or a study 13    conducted by an independent consultant recognized as 14    having expertise in environmental remediation has 15    determined a need for, the clean-up of hazardous waste, 16    hazardous substances, or underground storage tanks 17    required by State or federal law, provided that the 18    remediation costs constitute a material impediment to the 19    development or redevelopment of the redevelopment project 20    area.21        (13) The total equalized assessed value of the 22    proposed redevelopment project area has declined for 3 of 23    the last 5 calendar years for which information is 24    available or is increasing at an annual rate that is less 25    than the balance of the municipality for 3 of the last 5 26    calendar years for which information is available or is   SB2896- 15 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    increasing at an annual rate that is less than the 2    Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by 3    the United States Department of Labor or successor agency 4    for 3 of the last 5 calendar years for which information is 5    available.6    (c) "Industrial park" means an area in a blighted or 7conservation area suitable for use by any manufacturing, 8industrial, research or transportation enterprise, of 9facilities to include but not be limited to factories, mills, 10processing plants, assembly plants, packing plants, 11fabricating plants, industrial distribution centers, 12warehouses, repair overhaul or service facilities, freight 13terminals, research facilities, test facilities or railroad 14facilities.15    (d) "Industrial park conservation area" means an area 16within the boundaries of a redevelopment project area located 17within the territorial limits of a municipality that is a 18labor surplus municipality or within 1 1/2 miles of the 19territorial limits of a municipality that is a labor surplus 20municipality if the area is annexed to the municipality; which 21area is zoned as industrial no later than at the time the 22municipality by ordinance designates the redevelopment project 23area, and which area includes both vacant land suitable for 24use as an industrial park and a blighted area or conservation 25area contiguous to such vacant land.26    (e) "Labor surplus municipality" means a municipality in   SB2896- 16 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1which, at any time during the 6 months before the municipality 2by ordinance designates an industrial park conservation area, 3the unemployment rate was over 6% and was also 100% or more of 4the national average unemployment rate for that same time as 5published in the United States Department of Labor Bureau of 6Labor Statistics publication entitled "The Employment 7Situation" or its successor publication. For the purpose of 8this subsection, if unemployment rate statistics for the 9municipality are not available, the unemployment rate in the 10municipality shall be deemed to be the same as the 11unemployment rate in the principal county in which the 12municipality is located.13    (f) "Municipality" shall mean a city, village, 14incorporated town, or a township that is located in the 15unincorporated portion of a county with 3 million or more 16inhabitants, if the county adopted an ordinance that approved 17the township's redevelopment plan.18    (g) "Initial Sales Tax Amounts" means the amount of taxes 19paid under the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, Use Tax Act, 20Service Use Tax Act, the Service Occupation Tax Act, the 21Municipal Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, and the Municipal 22Service Occupation Tax Act by retailers and servicemen on 23transactions at places located in a State Sales Tax Boundary 24during the calendar year 1985.25    (g-1) "Revised Initial Sales Tax Amounts" means the amount 26of taxes paid under the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, Use Tax   SB2896- 17 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1Act, Service Use Tax Act, the Service Occupation Tax Act, the 2Municipal Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, and the Municipal 3Service Occupation Tax Act by retailers and servicemen on 4transactions at places located within the State Sales Tax 5Boundary revised pursuant to Section 11-74.4-8a(9) of this 6Act.7    (h) "Municipal Sales Tax Increment" means an amount equal 8to the increase in the aggregate amount of taxes paid to a 9municipality from the Local Government Tax Fund arising from 10sales by retailers and servicemen within the redevelopment 11project area or State Sales Tax Boundary, as the case may be, 12for as long as the redevelopment project area or State Sales 13Tax Boundary, as the case may be, exist over and above the 14aggregate amount of taxes as certified by the Illinois 15Department of Revenue and paid under the Municipal Retailers' 16Occupation Tax Act and the Municipal Service Occupation Tax 17Act by retailers and servicemen, on transactions at places of 18business located in the redevelopment project area or State 19Sales Tax Boundary, as the case may be, during the base year 20which shall be the calendar year immediately prior to the year 21in which the municipality adopted tax increment allocation 22financing. For purposes of computing the aggregate amount of 23such taxes for base years occurring prior to 1985, the 24Department of Revenue shall determine the Initial Sales Tax 25Amounts for such taxes and deduct therefrom an amount equal to 264% of the aggregate amount of taxes per year for each year the   SB2896- 18 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1base year is prior to 1985, but not to exceed a total deduction 2of 12%. The amount so determined shall be known as the 3"Adjusted Initial Sales Tax Amounts". For purposes of 4determining the Municipal Sales Tax Increment, the Department 5of Revenue shall for each period subtract from the amount paid 6to the municipality from the Local Government Tax Fund arising 7from sales by retailers and servicemen on transactions located 8in the redevelopment project area or the State Sales Tax 9Boundary, as the case may be, the certified Initial Sales Tax 10Amounts, the Adjusted Initial Sales Tax Amounts or the Revised 11Initial Sales Tax Amounts for the Municipal Retailers' 12Occupation Tax Act and the Municipal Service Occupation Tax 13Act. For the State Fiscal Year 1989, this calculation shall be 14made by utilizing the calendar year 1987 to determine the tax 15amounts received. For the State Fiscal Year 1990, this 16calculation shall be made by utilizing the period from January 171, 1988, until September 30, 1988, to determine the tax 18amounts received from retailers and servicemen pursuant to the 19Municipal Retailers' Occupation Tax and the Municipal Service 20Occupation Tax Act, which shall have deducted therefrom 21nine-twelfths of the certified Initial Sales Tax Amounts, the 22Adjusted Initial Sales Tax Amounts or the Revised Initial 23Sales Tax Amounts as appropriate. For the State Fiscal Year 241991, this calculation shall be made by utilizing the period 25from October 1, 1988, to June 30, 1989, to determine the tax 26amounts received from retailers and servicemen pursuant to the   SB2896- 19 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1Municipal Retailers' Occupation Tax and the Municipal Service 2Occupation Tax Act which shall have deducted therefrom 3nine-twelfths of the certified Initial Sales Tax Amounts, 4Adjusted Initial Sales Tax Amounts or the Revised Initial 5Sales Tax Amounts as appropriate. For every State Fiscal Year 6thereafter, the applicable period shall be the 12 months 7beginning July 1 and ending June 30 to determine the tax 8amounts received which shall have deducted therefrom the 9certified Initial Sales Tax Amounts, the Adjusted Initial 10Sales Tax Amounts or the Revised Initial Sales Tax Amounts, as 11the case may be.12    (i) "Net State Sales Tax Increment" means the sum of the 13following: (a) 80% of the first $100,000 of State Sales Tax 14Increment annually generated within a State Sales Tax 15Boundary; (b) 60% of the amount in excess of $100,000 but not 16exceeding $500,000 of State Sales Tax Increment annually 17generated within a State Sales Tax Boundary; and (c) 40% of all 18amounts in excess of $500,000 of State Sales Tax Increment 19annually generated within a State Sales Tax Boundary. If, 20however, a municipality established a tax increment financing 21district in a county with a population in excess of 3,000,000 22before January 1, 1986, and the municipality entered into a 23contract or issued bonds after January 1, 1986, but before 24December 31, 1986, to finance redevelopment project costs 25within a State Sales Tax Boundary, then the Net State Sales Tax 26Increment means, for the fiscal years beginning July 1, 1990,   SB2896- 20 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1and July 1, 1991, 100% of the State Sales Tax Increment 2annually generated within a State Sales Tax Boundary; and 3notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, for those 4fiscal years the Department of Revenue shall distribute to 5those municipalities 100% of their Net State Sales Tax 6Increment before any distribution to any other municipality 7and regardless of whether or not those other municipalities 8will receive 100% of their Net State Sales Tax Increment. For 9Fiscal Year 1999, and every year thereafter until the year 102007, for any municipality that has not entered into a 11contract or has not issued bonds prior to June 1, 1988 to 12finance redevelopment project costs within a State Sales Tax 13Boundary, the Net State Sales Tax Increment shall be 14calculated as follows: By multiplying the Net State Sales Tax 15Increment by 90% in the State Fiscal Year 1999; 80% in the 16State Fiscal Year 2000; 70% in the State Fiscal Year 2001; 60% 17in the State Fiscal Year 2002; 50% in the State Fiscal Year 182003; 40% in the State Fiscal Year 2004; 30% in the State 19Fiscal Year 2005; 20% in the State Fiscal Year 2006; and 10% in 20the State Fiscal Year 2007. No payment shall be made for State 21Fiscal Year 2008 and thereafter.22    Municipalities that issued bonds in connection with a 23redevelopment project in a redevelopment project area within 24the State Sales Tax Boundary prior to July 29, 1991, or that 25entered into contracts in connection with a redevelopment 26project in a redevelopment project area before June 1, 1988,   SB2896- 21 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1shall continue to receive their proportional share of the 2Illinois Tax Increment Fund distribution until the date on 3which the redevelopment project is completed or terminated. 4If, however, a municipality that issued bonds in connection 5with a redevelopment project in a redevelopment project area 6within the State Sales Tax Boundary prior to July 29, 1991 7retires the bonds prior to June 30, 2007 or a municipality that 8entered into contracts in connection with a redevelopment 9project in a redevelopment project area before June 1, 1988 10completes the contracts prior to June 30, 2007, then so long as 11the redevelopment project is not completed or is not 12terminated, the Net State Sales Tax Increment shall be 13calculated, beginning on the date on which the bonds are 14retired or the contracts are completed, as follows: By 15multiplying the Net State Sales Tax Increment by 60% in the 16State Fiscal Year 2002; 50% in the State Fiscal Year 2003; 40% 17in the State Fiscal Year 2004; 30% in the State Fiscal Year 182005; 20% in the State Fiscal Year 2006; and 10% in the State 19Fiscal Year 2007. No payment shall be made for State Fiscal 20Year 2008 and thereafter. Refunding of any bonds issued prior 21to July 29, 1991, shall not alter the Net State Sales Tax 22Increment.23    (j) "State Utility Tax Increment Amount" means an amount 24equal to the aggregate increase in State electric and gas tax 25charges imposed on owners and tenants, other than residential 26customers, of properties located within the redevelopment   SB2896- 22 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1project area under Section 9-222 of the Public Utilities Act, 2over and above the aggregate of such charges as certified by 3the Department of Revenue and paid by owners and tenants, 4other than residential customers, of properties within the 5redevelopment project area during the base year, which shall 6be the calendar year immediately prior to the year of the 7adoption of the ordinance authorizing tax increment allocation 8financing.9    (k) "Net State Utility Tax Increment" means the sum of the 10following: (a) 80% of the first $100,000 of State Utility Tax 11Increment annually generated by a redevelopment project area; 12(b) 60% of the amount in excess of $100,000 but not exceeding 13$500,000 of the State Utility Tax Increment annually generated 14by a redevelopment project area; and (c) 40% of all amounts in 15excess of $500,000 of State Utility Tax Increment annually 16generated by a redevelopment project area. For the State 17Fiscal Year 1999, and every year thereafter until the year 182007, for any municipality that has not entered into a 19contract or has not issued bonds prior to June 1, 1988 to 20finance redevelopment project costs within a redevelopment 21project area, the Net State Utility Tax Increment shall be 22calculated as follows: By multiplying the Net State Utility 23Tax Increment by 90% in the State Fiscal Year 1999; 80% in the 24State Fiscal Year 2000; 70% in the State Fiscal Year 2001; 60% 25in the State Fiscal Year 2002; 50% in the State Fiscal Year 262003; 40% in the State Fiscal Year 2004; 30% in the State   SB2896- 23 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1Fiscal Year 2005; 20% in the State Fiscal Year 2006; and 10% in 2the State Fiscal Year 2007. No payment shall be made for the 3State Fiscal Year 2008 and thereafter.4    Municipalities that issue bonds in connection with the 5redevelopment project during the period from June 1, 1988 6until 3 years after the effective date of this Amendatory Act 7of 1988 shall receive the Net State Utility Tax Increment, 8subject to appropriation, for 15 State Fiscal Years after the 9issuance of such bonds. For the 16th through the 20th State 10Fiscal Years after issuance of the bonds, the Net State 11Utility Tax Increment shall be calculated as follows: By 12multiplying the Net State Utility Tax Increment by 90% in year 1316; 80% in year 17; 70% in year 18; 60% in year 19; and 50% in 14year 20. Refunding of any bonds issued prior to June 1, 1988, 15shall not alter the revised Net State Utility Tax Increment 16payments set forth above.17    (l) "Obligations" mean bonds, loans, debentures, notes, 18special certificates or other evidence of indebtedness issued 19by the municipality to carry out a redevelopment project or to 20refund outstanding obligations.21    (m) "Payment in lieu of taxes" means those estimated tax 22revenues from real property in a redevelopment project area 23derived from real property that has been acquired by a 24municipality which according to the redevelopment project or 25plan is to be used for a private use which taxing districts 26would have received had a municipality not acquired the real   SB2896- 24 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1property and adopted tax increment allocation financing and 2which would result from levies made after the time of the 3adoption of tax increment allocation financing to the time the 4current equalized value of real property in the redevelopment 5project area exceeds the total initial equalized value of real 6property in said area.7    (n) "Redevelopment plan" means the comprehensive program 8of the municipality for development or redevelopment intended 9by the payment of redevelopment project costs to reduce or 10eliminate those conditions the existence of which qualified 11the redevelopment project area as a "blighted area" or 12"conservation area" or combination thereof or "industrial park 13conservation area," and thereby to enhance the tax bases of 14the taxing districts which extend into the redevelopment 15project area, provided that, with respect to redevelopment 16project areas described in subsections (p-1) and (p-2), 17"redevelopment plan" means the comprehensive program of the 18affected municipality for the development of qualifying 19transit facilities. On and after November 1, 1999 (the 20effective date of Public Act 91-478), no redevelopment plan 21may be approved or amended that includes the development of 22vacant land (i) with a golf course and related clubhouse and 23other facilities or (ii) designated by federal, State, county, 24or municipal government as public land for outdoor 25recreational activities or for nature preserves and used for 26that purpose within 5 years prior to the adoption of the   SB2896- 25 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1redevelopment plan. For the purpose of this subsection, 2"recreational activities" is limited to mean camping and 3hunting. Each redevelopment plan shall set forth in writing 4the program to be undertaken to accomplish the objectives and 5shall include but not be limited to:6        (A) an itemized list of estimated redevelopment 7    project costs;8        (B) evidence indicating that the redevelopment project 9    area on the whole has not been subject to growth and 10    development through investment by private enterprise, 11    provided that such evidence shall not be required for any 12    redevelopment project area located within a transit 13    facility improvement area established pursuant to Section 14    11-74.4-3.3;15        (C) an assessment of any financial impact of the 16    redevelopment project area on or any increased demand for 17    services from any taxing district affected by the plan and 18    any program to address such financial impact or increased 19    demand;20        (D) the sources of funds to pay costs;21        (E) the nature and term of the obligations to be 22    issued;23        (F) the most recent equalized assessed valuation of 24    the redevelopment project area;25        (G) an estimate as to the equalized assessed valuation 26    after redevelopment and the general land uses to apply in   SB2896- 26 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    the redevelopment project area;2        (H) a commitment to fair employment practices and an 3    affirmative action plan;4        (I) if it concerns an industrial park conservation 5    area, the plan shall also include a general description of 6    any proposed developer, user and tenant of any property, a 7    description of the type, structure and general character 8    of the facilities to be developed, a description of the 9    type, class and number of new employees to be employed in 10    the operation of the facilities to be developed; and11        (J) if property is to be annexed to the municipality, 12    the plan shall include the terms of the annexation 13    agreement.14    The provisions of items (B) and (C) of this subsection (n) 15shall not apply to a municipality that before March 14, 1994 16(the effective date of Public Act 88-537) had fixed, either by 17its corporate authorities or by a commission designated under 18subsection (k) of Section 11-74.4-4, a time and place for a 19public hearing as required by subsection (a) of Section 2011-74.4-5. No redevelopment plan shall be adopted unless a 21municipality complies with all of the following requirements:22        (1) The municipality finds that the redevelopment 23    project area on the whole has not been subject to growth 24    and development through investment by private enterprise 25    and would not reasonably be anticipated to be developed 26    without the adoption of the redevelopment plan, provided,   SB2896- 27 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    however, that such a finding shall not be required with 2    respect to any redevelopment project area located within a 3    transit facility improvement area established pursuant to 4    Section 11-74.4-3.3.5        (2) The municipality finds that the redevelopment plan 6    and project conform to the comprehensive plan for the 7    development of the municipality as a whole, or, for 8    municipalities with a population of 100,000 or more, 9    regardless of when the redevelopment plan and project was 10    adopted, the redevelopment plan and project either: (i) 11    conforms to the strategic economic development or 12    redevelopment plan issued by the designated planning 13    authority of the municipality, or (ii) includes land uses 14    that have been approved by the planning commission of the 15    municipality.16        (3) The redevelopment plan establishes the estimated 17    dates of completion of the redevelopment project and 18    retirement of obligations issued to finance redevelopment 19    project costs. Those dates may not be later than the dates 20    set forth under Section 11-74.4-3.5.21        A municipality may by municipal ordinance amend an 22    existing redevelopment plan to conform to this paragraph 23    (3) as amended by Public Act 91-478, which municipal 24    ordinance may be adopted without further hearing or notice 25    and without complying with the procedures provided in this 26    Act pertaining to an amendment to or the initial approval   SB2896- 28 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    of a redevelopment plan and project and designation of a 2    redevelopment project area.3        (3.5) The municipality finds, in the case of an 4    industrial park conservation area, also that the 5    municipality is a labor surplus municipality and that the 6    implementation of the redevelopment plan will reduce 7    unemployment, create new jobs and by the provision of new 8    facilities enhance the tax base of the taxing districts 9    that extend into the redevelopment project area.10        (4) If any incremental revenues are being utilized 11    under Section 8(a)(1) or 8(a)(2) of this Act in 12    redevelopment project areas approved by ordinance after 13    January 1, 1986, the municipality finds: (a) that the 14    redevelopment project area would not reasonably be 15    developed without the use of such incremental revenues, 16    and (b) that such incremental revenues will be exclusively 17    utilized for the development of the redevelopment project 18    area.19        (5) If: (a) the redevelopment plan will not result in 20    displacement of residents from 10 or more inhabited 21    residential units, and the municipality certifies in the 22    plan that such displacement will not result from the plan; 23    or (b) the redevelopment plan is for a redevelopment 24    project area or a qualifying transit facility located 25    within a transit facility improvement area established 26    pursuant to Section 11-74.4-3.3, and the applicable   SB2896- 29 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    project is subject to the process for evaluation of 2    environmental effects under the National Environmental 3    Policy Act of 1969, 42 U.S.C. 4321 et seq., then a housing 4    impact study need not be performed. If, however, the 5    redevelopment plan would result in the displacement of 6    residents from 10 or more inhabited residential units, or 7    if the redevelopment project area contains 75 or more 8    inhabited residential units and no certification is made, 9    then the municipality shall prepare, as part of the 10    separate feasibility report required by subsection (a) of 11    Section 11-74.4-5, a housing impact study.12        Part I of the housing impact study shall include (i) 13    data as to whether the residential units are single family 14    or multi-family units, (ii) the number and type of rooms 15    within the units, if that information is available, (iii) 16    whether the units are inhabited or uninhabited, as 17    determined not less than 45 days before the date that the 18    ordinance or resolution required by subsection (a) of 19    Section 11-74.4-5 is passed, and (iv) data as to the 20    racial and ethnic composition of the residents in the 21    inhabited residential units. The data requirement as to 22    the racial and ethnic composition of the residents in the 23    inhabited residential units shall be deemed to be fully 24    satisfied by data from the most recent federal census.25        Part II of the housing impact study shall identify the 26    inhabited residential units in the proposed redevelopment   SB2896- 30 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    project area that are to be or may be removed. If inhabited 2    residential units are to be removed, then the housing 3    impact study shall identify (i) the number and location of 4    those units that will or may be removed, (ii) the 5    municipality's plans for relocation assistance for those 6    residents in the proposed redevelopment project area whose 7    residences are to be removed, (iii) the availability of 8    replacement housing for those residents whose residences 9    are to be removed, and shall identify the type, location, 10    and cost of the housing, and (iv) the type and extent of 11    relocation assistance to be provided.12        (6) On and after November 1, 1999, the housing impact 13    study required by paragraph (5) shall be incorporated in 14    the redevelopment plan for the redevelopment project area.15        (7) On and after November 1, 1999, no redevelopment 16    plan shall be adopted, nor an existing plan amended, nor 17    shall residential housing that is occupied by households 18    of low-income and very low-income persons in currently 19    existing redevelopment project areas be removed after 20    November 1, 1999 unless the redevelopment plan provides, 21    with respect to inhabited housing units that are to be 22    removed for households of low-income and very low-income 23    persons, affordable housing and relocation assistance not 24    less than that which would be provided under the federal 25    Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property 26    Acquisition Policies Act of 1970 and the regulations under   SB2896- 31 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    that Act, including the eligibility criteria. Affordable 2    housing may be either existing or newly constructed 3    housing. For purposes of this paragraph (7), "low-income 4    households", "very low-income households", and "affordable 5    housing" have the meanings set forth in the Illinois 6    Affordable Housing Act. The municipality shall make a good 7    faith effort to ensure that this affordable housing is 8    located in or near the redevelopment project area within 9    the municipality.10        (8) On and after November 1, 1999, if, after the 11    adoption of the redevelopment plan for the redevelopment 12    project area, any municipality desires to amend its 13    redevelopment plan to remove more inhabited residential 14    units than specified in its original redevelopment plan, 15    that change shall be made in accordance with the 16    procedures in subsection (c) of Section 11-74.4-5.17        (9) For redevelopment project areas designated prior 18    to November 1, 1999, the redevelopment plan may be amended 19    without further joint review board meeting or hearing, 20    provided that the municipality shall give notice of any 21    such changes by mail to each affected taxing district and 22    registrant on the interested party registry, to authorize 23    the municipality to expend tax increment revenues for 24    redevelopment project costs defined by paragraphs (5) and 25    (7.5), subparagraphs (E) and (F) of paragraph (11), and 26    paragraph (11.5) of subsection (q) of Section 11-74.4-3,   SB2896- 32 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    so long as the changes do not increase the total estimated 2    redevelopment project costs set out in the redevelopment 3    plan by more than 5% after adjustment for inflation from 4    the date the plan was adopted.5    (o) "Redevelopment project" means any public and private 6development project in furtherance of the objectives of a 7redevelopment plan. On and after November 1, 1999 (the 8effective date of Public Act 91-478), no redevelopment plan 9may be approved or amended that includes the development of 10vacant land (i) with a golf course and related clubhouse and 11other facilities or (ii) designated by federal, State, county, 12or municipal government as public land for outdoor 13recreational activities or for nature preserves and used for 14that purpose within 5 years prior to the adoption of the 15redevelopment plan. For the purpose of this subsection, 16"recreational activities" is limited to mean camping and 17hunting.18    (p) "Redevelopment project area" means an area designated 19by the municipality, which is not less in the aggregate than 1 201/2 acres and in respect to which the municipality has made a 21finding that there exist conditions which cause the area to be 22classified as an industrial park conservation area or a 23blighted area or a conservation area, or a combination of both 24blighted areas and conservation areas.25    (p-1) Notwithstanding any provision of this Act to the 26contrary, on and after August 25, 2009 (the effective date of   SB2896- 33 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1Public Act 96-680), a redevelopment project area may include 2areas within a one-half mile radius of an existing or proposed 3Regional Transportation Authority Suburban Transit Access 4Route (STAR Line) station without a finding that the area is 5classified as an industrial park conservation area, a blighted 6area, a conservation area, or a combination thereof, but only 7if the municipality receives unanimous consent from the joint 8review board created to review the proposed redevelopment 9project area. 10    (p-2) Notwithstanding any provision of this Act to the 11contrary, on and after the effective date of this amendatory 12Act of the 99th General Assembly, a redevelopment project area 13may include areas within a transit facility improvement area 14that has been established pursuant to Section 11-74.4-3.3 15without a finding that the area is classified as an industrial 16park conservation area, a blighted area, a conservation area, 17or any combination thereof. 18    (p-3) Notwithstanding any provision of this Act to the 19contrary, on and after the effective date of this amendatory 20Act of the 104th General Assembly, a redevelopment project 21area and any amendment adding one or more additional areas to 22an existing redevelopment project area created under this 23Division may include areas within the Big Island River 24Conservancy District created under the River Conservancy 25Districts Act only if the municipality receives unanimous 26consent from both (1) the board of trustees of the Big Island   SB2896- 34 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1River Conservancy District and (2) the joint review board 2created to review the proposed redevelopment project area and 3any proposed amendment of any existing redevelopment project 4area. 5    (q) "Redevelopment project costs", except for 6redevelopment project areas created pursuant to subsection 7(p-1) or (p-2), means and includes the sum total of all 8reasonable or necessary costs incurred or estimated to be 9incurred, and any such costs incidental to a redevelopment 10plan and a redevelopment project. Such costs include, without 11limitation, the following:12        (1) Costs of studies, surveys, development of plans, 13    and specifications, implementation and administration of 14    the redevelopment plan including but not limited to staff 15    and professional service costs for architectural, 16    engineering, legal, financial, planning or other services, 17    provided however that no charges for professional services 18    may be based on a percentage of the tax increment 19    collected; except that on and after November 1, 1999 (the 20    effective date of Public Act 91-478), no contracts for 21    professional services, excluding architectural and 22    engineering services, may be entered into if the terms of 23    the contract extend beyond a period of 3 years. In 24    addition, "redevelopment project costs" shall not include 25    lobbying expenses. After consultation with the 26    municipality, each tax increment consultant or advisor to   SB2896- 35 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    a municipality that plans to designate or has designated a 2    redevelopment project area shall inform the municipality 3    in writing of any contracts that the consultant or advisor 4    has entered into with entities or individuals that have 5    received, or are receiving, payments financed by tax 6    increment revenues produced by the redevelopment project 7    area with respect to which the consultant or advisor has 8    performed, or will be performing, service for the 9    municipality. This requirement shall be satisfied by the 10    consultant or advisor before the commencement of services 11    for the municipality and thereafter whenever any other 12    contracts with those individuals or entities are executed 13    by the consultant or advisor;14        (1.5) After July 1, 1999, annual administrative costs 15    shall not include general overhead or administrative costs 16    of the municipality that would still have been incurred by 17    the municipality if the municipality had not designated a 18    redevelopment project area or approved a redevelopment 19    plan;20        (1.6) The cost of marketing sites within the 21    redevelopment project area to prospective businesses, 22    developers, and investors;23        (2) Property assembly costs, including but not limited 24    to acquisition of land and other property, real or 25    personal, or rights or interests therein, demolition of 26    buildings, site preparation, site improvements that serve   SB2896- 36 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    as an engineered barrier addressing ground level or below 2    ground environmental contamination, including, but not 3    limited to parking lots and other concrete or asphalt 4    barriers, and the clearing and grading of land;5        (3) Costs of rehabilitation, reconstruction or repair 6    or remodeling of existing public or private buildings, 7    fixtures, and leasehold improvements; and the cost of 8    replacing an existing public building if pursuant to the 9    implementation of a redevelopment project the existing 10    public building is to be demolished to use the site for 11    private investment or devoted to a different use requiring 12    private investment; including any direct or indirect costs 13    relating to Green Globes or LEED certified construction 14    elements or construction elements with an equivalent 15    certification;16        (4) Costs of the construction of public works or 17    improvements, including any direct or indirect costs 18    relating to Green Globes or LEED certified construction 19    elements or construction elements with an equivalent 20    certification, except that on and after November 1, 1999, 21    redevelopment project costs shall not include the cost of 22    constructing a new municipal public building principally 23    used to provide offices, storage space, or conference 24    facilities or vehicle storage, maintenance, or repair for 25    administrative, public safety, or public works personnel 26    and that is not intended to replace an existing public   SB2896- 37 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    building as provided under paragraph (3) of subsection (q) 2    of Section 11-74.4-3 unless either (i) the construction of 3    the new municipal building implements a redevelopment 4    project that was included in a redevelopment plan that was 5    adopted by the municipality prior to November 1, 1999, 6    (ii) the municipality makes a reasonable determination in 7    the redevelopment plan, supported by information that 8    provides the basis for that determination, that the new 9    municipal building is required to meet an increase in the 10    need for public safety purposes anticipated to result from 11    the implementation of the redevelopment plan, or (iii) the 12    new municipal public building is for the storage, 13    maintenance, or repair of transit vehicles and is located 14    in a transit facility improvement area that has been 15    established pursuant to Section 11-74.4-3.3;16        (5) Costs of job training and retraining projects, 17    including the cost of "welfare to work" programs 18    implemented by businesses located within the redevelopment 19    project area;20        (6) Financing costs, including but not limited to all 21    necessary and incidental expenses related to the issuance 22    of obligations and which may include payment of interest 23    on any obligations issued hereunder including interest 24    accruing during the estimated period of construction of 25    any redevelopment project for which such obligations are 26    issued and for not exceeding 36 months thereafter and   SB2896- 38 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    including reasonable reserves related thereto;2        (7) To the extent the municipality by written 3    agreement accepts and approves the same, all or a portion 4    of a taxing district's capital costs resulting from the 5    redevelopment project necessarily incurred or to be 6    incurred within a taxing district in furtherance of the 7    objectives of the redevelopment plan and project;8        (7.5) For redevelopment project areas designated (or 9    redevelopment project areas amended to add or increase the 10    number of tax-increment-financing assisted housing units) 11    on or after November 1, 1999, an elementary, secondary, or 12    unit school district's increased costs attributable to 13    assisted housing units located within the redevelopment 14    project area for which the developer or redeveloper 15    receives financial assistance through an agreement with 16    the municipality or because the municipality incurs the 17    cost of necessary infrastructure improvements within the 18    boundaries of the assisted housing sites necessary for the 19    completion of that housing as authorized by this Act, and 20    which costs shall be paid by the municipality from the 21    Special Tax Allocation Fund when the tax increment revenue 22    is received as a result of the assisted housing units and 23    shall be calculated annually as follows:24            (A) for foundation districts, excluding any school 25        district in a municipality with a population in excess 26        of 1,000,000, by multiplying the district's increase   SB2896- 39 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1        in attendance resulting from the net increase in new 2        students enrolled in that school district who reside 3        in housing units within the redevelopment project area 4        that have received financial assistance through an 5        agreement with the municipality or because the 6        municipality incurs the cost of necessary 7        infrastructure improvements within the boundaries of 8        the housing sites necessary for the completion of that 9        housing as authorized by this Act since the 10        designation of the redevelopment project area by the 11        most recently available per capita tuition cost as 12        defined in Section 10-20.12a of the School Code less 13        any increase in general State aid as defined in 14        Section 18-8.05 of the School Code or evidence-based 15        funding as defined in Section 18-8.15 of the School 16        Code attributable to these added new students subject 17        to the following annual limitations:18                (i) for unit school districts with a district 19            average 1995-96 Per Capita Tuition Charge of less 20            than $5,900, no more than 25% of the total amount 21            of property tax increment revenue produced by 22            those housing units that have received tax 23            increment finance assistance under this Act;24                (ii) for elementary school districts with a 25            district average 1995-96 Per Capita Tuition Charge 26            of less than $5,900, no more than 17% of the total   SB2896- 40 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1            amount of property tax increment revenue produced 2            by those housing units that have received tax 3            increment finance assistance under this Act; and4                (iii) for secondary school districts with a 5            district average 1995-96 Per Capita Tuition Charge 6            of less than $5,900, no more than 8% of the total 7            amount of property tax increment revenue produced 8            by those housing units that have received tax 9            increment finance assistance under this Act.10            (B) For alternate method districts, flat grant 11        districts, and foundation districts with a district 12        average 1995-96 Per Capita Tuition Charge equal to or 13        more than $5,900, excluding any school district with a 14        population in excess of 1,000,000, by multiplying the 15        district's increase in attendance resulting from the 16        net increase in new students enrolled in that school 17        district who reside in housing units within the 18        redevelopment project area that have received 19        financial assistance through an agreement with the 20        municipality or because the municipality incurs the 21        cost of necessary infrastructure improvements within 22        the boundaries of the housing sites necessary for the 23        completion of that housing as authorized by this Act 24        since the designation of the redevelopment project 25        area by the most recently available per capita tuition 26        cost as defined in Section 10-20.12a of the School   SB2896- 41 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1        Code less any increase in general state aid as defined 2        in Section 18-8.05 of the School Code or 3        evidence-based funding as defined in Section 18-8.15 4        of the School Code attributable to these added new 5        students subject to the following annual limitations:6                (i) for unit school districts, no more than 7            40% of the total amount of property tax increment 8            revenue produced by those housing units that have 9            received tax increment finance assistance under 10            this Act;11                (ii) for elementary school districts, no more 12            than 27% of the total amount of property tax 13            increment revenue produced by those housing units 14            that have received tax increment finance 15            assistance under this Act; and16                (iii) for secondary school districts, no more 17            than 13% of the total amount of property tax 18            increment revenue produced by those housing units 19            that have received tax increment finance 20            assistance under this Act.21            (C) For any school district in a municipality with 22        a population in excess of 1,000,000, the following 23        restrictions shall apply to the reimbursement of 24        increased costs under this paragraph (7.5):25                (i) no increased costs shall be reimbursed 26            unless the school district certifies that each of   SB2896- 42 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1            the schools affected by the assisted housing 2            project is at or over its student capacity;3                (ii) the amount reimbursable shall be reduced 4            by the value of any land donated to the school 5            district by the municipality or developer, and by 6            the value of any physical improvements made to the 7            schools by the municipality or developer; and8                (iii) the amount reimbursed may not affect 9            amounts otherwise obligated by the terms of any 10            bonds, notes, or other funding instruments, or the 11            terms of any redevelopment agreement.12        Any school district seeking payment under this 13        paragraph (7.5) shall, after July 1 and before 14        September 30 of each year, provide the municipality 15        with reasonable evidence to support its claim for 16        reimbursement before the municipality shall be 17        required to approve or make the payment to the school 18        district. If the school district fails to provide the 19        information during this period in any year, it shall 20        forfeit any claim to reimbursement for that year. 21        School districts may adopt a resolution waiving the 22        right to all or a portion of the reimbursement 23        otherwise required by this paragraph (7.5). By 24        acceptance of this reimbursement the school district 25        waives the right to directly or indirectly set aside, 26        modify, or contest in any manner the establishment of   SB2896- 43 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1        the redevelopment project area or projects;2        (7.7) For redevelopment project areas designated (or 3    redevelopment project areas amended to add or increase the 4    number of tax-increment-financing assisted housing units) 5    on or after January 1, 2005 (the effective date of Public 6    Act 93-961), a public library district's increased costs 7    attributable to assisted housing units located within the 8    redevelopment project area for which the developer or 9    redeveloper receives financial assistance through an 10    agreement with the municipality or because the 11    municipality incurs the cost of necessary infrastructure 12    improvements within the boundaries of the assisted housing 13    sites necessary for the completion of that housing as 14    authorized by this Act shall be paid to the library 15    district by the municipality from the Special Tax 16    Allocation Fund when the tax increment revenue is received 17    as a result of the assisted housing units. This paragraph 18    (7.7) applies only if (i) the library district is located 19    in a county that is subject to the Property Tax Extension 20    Limitation Law or (ii) the library district is not located 21    in a county that is subject to the Property Tax Extension 22    Limitation Law but the district is prohibited by any other 23    law from increasing its tax levy rate without a prior 24    voter referendum.25        The amount paid to a library district under this 26    paragraph (7.7) shall be calculated by multiplying (i) the   SB2896- 44 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    net increase in the number of persons eligible to obtain a 2    library card in that district who reside in housing units 3    within the redevelopment project area that have received 4    financial assistance through an agreement with the 5    municipality or because the municipality incurs the cost 6    of necessary infrastructure improvements within the 7    boundaries of the housing sites necessary for the 8    completion of that housing as authorized by this Act since 9    the designation of the redevelopment project area by (ii) 10    the per-patron cost of providing library services so long 11    as it does not exceed $120. The per-patron cost shall be 12    the Total Operating Expenditures Per Capita for the 13    library in the previous fiscal year. The municipality may 14    deduct from the amount that it must pay to a library 15    district under this paragraph any amount that it has 16    voluntarily paid to the library district from the tax 17    increment revenue. The amount paid to a library district 18    under this paragraph (7.7) shall be no more than 2% of the 19    amount produced by the assisted housing units and 20    deposited into the Special Tax Allocation Fund.21        A library district is not eligible for any payment 22    under this paragraph (7.7) unless the library district has 23    experienced an increase in the number of patrons from the 24    municipality that created the tax-increment-financing 25    district since the designation of the redevelopment 26    project area.  SB2896- 45 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1        Any library district seeking payment under this 2    paragraph (7.7) shall, after July 1 and before September 3    30 of each year, provide the municipality with convincing 4    evidence to support its claim for reimbursement before the 5    municipality shall be required to approve or make the 6    payment to the library district. If the library district 7    fails to provide the information during this period in any 8    year, it shall forfeit any claim to reimbursement for that 9    year. Library districts may adopt a resolution waiving the 10    right to all or a portion of the reimbursement otherwise 11    required by this paragraph (7.7). By acceptance of such 12    reimbursement, the library district shall forfeit any 13    right to directly or indirectly set aside, modify, or 14    contest in any manner whatsoever the establishment of the 15    redevelopment project area or projects;16        (8) Relocation costs to the extent that a municipality 17    determines that relocation costs shall be paid or is 18    required to make payment of relocation costs by federal or 19    State law or in order to satisfy subparagraph (7) of 20    subsection (n);21        (9) Payment in lieu of taxes;22        (10) Costs of job training, retraining, advanced 23    vocational education or career education, including but 24    not limited to courses in occupational, semi-technical or 25    technical fields leading directly to employment, incurred 26    by one or more taxing districts, provided that such costs   SB2896- 46 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    (i) are related to the establishment and maintenance of 2    additional job training, advanced vocational education or 3    career education programs for persons employed or to be 4    employed by employers located in a redevelopment project 5    area; and (ii) when incurred by a taxing district or 6    taxing districts other than the municipality, are set 7    forth in a written agreement by or among the municipality 8    and the taxing district or taxing districts, which 9    agreement describes the program to be undertaken, 10    including but not limited to the number of employees to be 11    trained, a description of the training and services to be 12    provided, the number and type of positions available or to 13    be available, itemized costs of the program and sources of 14    funds to pay for the same, and the term of the agreement. 15    Such costs include, specifically, the payment by community 16    college districts of costs pursuant to Sections 3-37, 17    3-38, 3-40 and 3-40.1 of the Public Community College Act 18    and by school districts of costs pursuant to Sections 19    10-22.20a and 10-23.3a of the School Code;20        (11) Interest cost incurred by a redeveloper related 21    to the construction, renovation or rehabilitation of a 22    redevelopment project provided that:23            (A) such costs are to be paid directly from the 24        special tax allocation fund established pursuant to 25        this Act;26            (B) such payments in any one year may not exceed   SB2896- 47 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1        30% of the annual interest costs incurred by the 2        redeveloper with regard to the redevelopment project 3        during that year;4            (C) if there are not sufficient funds available in 5        the special tax allocation fund to make the payment 6        pursuant to this paragraph (11) then the amounts so 7        due shall accrue and be payable when sufficient funds 8        are available in the special tax allocation fund;9            (D) the total of such interest payments paid 10        pursuant to this Act may not exceed 30% of the total 11        (i) cost paid or incurred by the redeveloper for the 12        redevelopment project plus (ii) redevelopment project 13        costs excluding any property assembly costs and any 14        relocation costs incurred by a municipality pursuant 15        to this Act;16            (E) the cost limits set forth in subparagraphs (B) 17        and (D) of paragraph (11) shall be modified for the 18        financing of rehabilitated or new housing units for 19        low-income households and very low-income households, 20        as defined in Section 3 of the Illinois Affordable 21        Housing Act. The percentage of 75% shall be 22        substituted for 30% in subparagraphs (B) and (D) of 23        paragraph (11); and24            (F) instead of the eligible costs provided by 25        subparagraphs (B) and (D) of paragraph (11), as 26        modified by this subparagraph, and notwithstanding any   SB2896- 48 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1        other provisions of this Act to the contrary, the 2        municipality may pay from tax increment revenues up to 3        50% of the cost of construction of new housing units to 4        be occupied by low-income households and very 5        low-income households as defined in Section 3 of the 6        Illinois Affordable Housing Act. The cost of 7        construction of those units may be derived from the 8        proceeds of bonds issued by the municipality under 9        this Act or other constitutional or statutory 10        authority or from other sources of municipal revenue 11        that may be reimbursed from tax increment revenues or 12        the proceeds of bonds issued to finance the 13        construction of that housing.14            The eligible costs provided under this 15        subparagraph (F) of paragraph (11) shall be an 16        eligible cost for the construction, renovation, and 17        rehabilitation of all low and very low-income housing 18        units, as defined in Section 3 of the Illinois 19        Affordable Housing Act, within the redevelopment 20        project area. If the low and very low-income units are 21        part of a residential redevelopment project that 22        includes units not affordable to low and very 23        low-income households, only the low and very 24        low-income units shall be eligible for benefits under 25        this subparagraph (F) of paragraph (11). The standards 26        for maintaining the occupancy by low-income households   SB2896- 49 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1        and very low-income households, as defined in Section 2        3 of the Illinois Affordable Housing Act, of those 3        units constructed with eligible costs made available 4        under the provisions of this subparagraph (F) of 5        paragraph (11) shall be established by guidelines 6        adopted by the municipality. The responsibility for 7        annually documenting the initial occupancy of the 8        units by low-income households and very low-income 9        households, as defined in Section 3 of the Illinois 10        Affordable Housing Act, shall be that of the then 11        current owner of the property. For ownership units, 12        the guidelines will provide, at a minimum, for a 13        reasonable recapture of funds, or other appropriate 14        methods designed to preserve the original 15        affordability of the ownership units. For rental 16        units, the guidelines will provide, at a minimum, for 17        the affordability of rent to low and very low-income 18        households. As units become available, they shall be 19        rented to income-eligible tenants. The municipality 20        may modify these guidelines from time to time; the 21        guidelines, however, shall be in effect for as long as 22        tax increment revenue is being used to pay for costs 23        associated with the units or for the retirement of 24        bonds issued to finance the units or for the life of 25        the redevelopment project area, whichever is later;26        (11.5) If the redevelopment project area is located   SB2896- 50 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1    within a municipality with a population of more than 2    100,000, the cost of day care services for children of 3    employees from low-income families working for businesses 4    located within the redevelopment project area and all or a 5    portion of the cost of operation of day care centers 6    established by redevelopment project area businesses to 7    serve employees from low-income families working in 8    businesses located in the redevelopment project area. For 9    the purposes of this paragraph, "low-income families" 10    means families whose annual income does not exceed 80% of 11    the municipal, county, or regional median income, adjusted 12    for family size, as the annual income and municipal, 13    county, or regional median income are determined from time 14    to time by the United States Department of Housing and 15    Urban Development.16        (12) Costs relating to the development of urban 17    agricultural areas under Division 15.2 of the Illinois 18    Municipal Code. 19    Unless explicitly stated herein the cost of construction 20of new privately-owned buildings shall not be an eligible 21redevelopment project cost.22    After November 1, 1999 (the effective date of Public Act 2391-478), none of the redevelopment project costs enumerated in 24this subsection shall be eligible redevelopment project costs 25if those costs would provide direct financial support to a 26retail entity initiating operations in the redevelopment   SB2896- 51 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1project area while terminating operations at another Illinois 2location within 10 miles of the redevelopment project area but 3outside the boundaries of the redevelopment project area 4municipality. For purposes of this paragraph, termination 5means a closing of a retail operation that is directly related 6to the opening of the same operation or like retail entity 7owned or operated by more than 50% of the original ownership in 8a redevelopment project area, but it does not mean closing an 9operation for reasons beyond the control of the retail entity, 10as documented by the retail entity, subject to a reasonable 11finding by the municipality that the current location 12contained inadequate space, had become economically obsolete, 13or was no longer a viable location for the retailer or 14serviceman.15    No cost shall be a redevelopment project cost in a 16redevelopment project area if used to demolish, remove, or 17substantially modify a historic resource, after August 26, 182008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-934), unless no 19prudent and feasible alternative exists. "Historic resource" 20for the purpose of this paragraph means (i) a place or 21structure that is included or eligible for inclusion on the 22National Register of Historic Places or (ii) a contributing 23structure in a district on the National Register of Historic 24Places. This paragraph does not apply to a place or structure 25for which demolition, removal, or modification is subject to 26review by the preservation agency of a Certified Local   SB2896- 52 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1Government designated as such by the National Park Service of 2the United States Department of the Interior.3    If a special service area has been established pursuant to 4the Special Service Area Tax Act or Special Service Area Tax 5Law, then any tax increment revenues derived from the tax 6imposed pursuant to the Special Service Area Tax Act or 7Special Service Area Tax Law may be used within the 8redevelopment project area for the purposes permitted by that 9Act or Law as well as the purposes permitted by this Act.10    (q-1) For redevelopment project areas created pursuant to 11subsection (p-1), redevelopment project costs are limited to 12those costs in paragraph (q) that are related to the existing 13or proposed Regional Transportation Authority Suburban Transit 14Access Route (STAR Line) station. 15    (q-2) For a transit facility improvement area established 16prior to, on, or after the effective date of this amendatory 17Act of the 102nd General Assembly: (i) "redevelopment project 18costs" means those costs described in subsection (q) that are 19related to the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 20remodeling, or repair of any existing or proposed transit 21facility, whether that facility is located within or outside 22the boundaries of a redevelopment project area established 23within that transit facility improvement area (and, to the 24extent a redevelopment project cost is described in subsection 25(q) as incurred or estimated to be incurred with respect to a 26redevelopment project area, then it shall apply with respect   SB2896- 53 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1to such transit facility improvement area); and (ii) the 2provisions of Section 11-74.4-8 regarding tax increment 3allocation financing for a redevelopment project area located 4in a transit facility improvement area shall apply only to the 5lots, blocks, tracts and parcels of real property that are 6located within the boundaries of that redevelopment project 7area and not to the lots, blocks, tracts, and parcels of real 8property that are located outside the boundaries of that 9redevelopment project area. 10    (r) "State Sales Tax Boundary" means the redevelopment 11project area or the amended redevelopment project area 12boundaries which are determined pursuant to subsection (9) of 13Section 11-74.4-8a of this Act. The Department of Revenue 14shall certify pursuant to subsection (9) of Section 11-74.4-8a 15the appropriate boundaries eligible for the determination of 16State Sales Tax Increment.17    (s) "State Sales Tax Increment" means an amount equal to 18the increase in the aggregate amount of taxes paid by 19retailers and servicemen, other than retailers and servicemen 20subject to the Public Utilities Act, on transactions at places 21of business located within a State Sales Tax Boundary pursuant 22to the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, the Use Tax Act, the 23Service Use Tax Act, and the Service Occupation Tax Act, 24except such portion of such increase that is paid into the 25State and Local Sales Tax Reform Fund, the Local Government 26Distributive Fund, the Local Government Tax Fund and the   SB2896- 54 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1County and Mass Transit District Fund, for as long as State 2participation exists, over and above the Initial Sales Tax 3Amounts, Adjusted Initial Sales Tax Amounts or the Revised 4Initial Sales Tax Amounts for such taxes as certified by the 5Department of Revenue and paid under those Acts by retailers 6and servicemen on transactions at places of business located 7within the State Sales Tax Boundary during the base year which 8shall be the calendar year immediately prior to the year in 9which the municipality adopted tax increment allocation 10financing, less 3.0% of such amounts generated under the 11Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, Use Tax Act and Service Use Tax 12Act and the Service Occupation Tax Act, which sum shall be 13appropriated to the Department of Revenue to cover its costs 14of administering and enforcing this Section. For purposes of 15computing the aggregate amount of such taxes for base years 16occurring prior to 1985, the Department of Revenue shall 17compute the Initial Sales Tax Amount for such taxes and deduct 18therefrom an amount equal to 4% of the aggregate amount of 19taxes per year for each year the base year is prior to 1985, 20but not to exceed a total deduction of 12%. The amount so 21determined shall be known as the "Adjusted Initial Sales Tax 22Amount". For purposes of determining the State Sales Tax 23Increment the Department of Revenue shall for each period 24subtract from the tax amounts received from retailers and 25servicemen on transactions located in the State Sales Tax 26Boundary, the certified Initial Sales Tax Amounts, Adjusted   SB2896- 55 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1Initial Sales Tax Amounts or Revised Initial Sales Tax Amounts 2for the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, the Use Tax Act, the 3Service Use Tax Act and the Service Occupation Tax Act. For the 4State Fiscal Year 1989 this calculation shall be made by 5utilizing the calendar year 1987 to determine the tax amounts 6received. For the State Fiscal Year 1990, this calculation 7shall be made by utilizing the period from January 1, 1988, 8until September 30, 1988, to determine the tax amounts 9received from retailers and servicemen, which shall have 10deducted therefrom nine-twelfths of the certified Initial 11Sales Tax Amounts, Adjusted Initial Sales Tax Amounts or the 12Revised Initial Sales Tax Amounts as appropriate. For the 13State Fiscal Year 1991, this calculation shall be made by 14utilizing the period from October 1, 1988, until June 30, 151989, to determine the tax amounts received from retailers and 16servicemen, which shall have deducted therefrom nine-twelfths 17of the certified Initial State Sales Tax Amounts, Adjusted 18Initial Sales Tax Amounts or the Revised Initial Sales Tax 19Amounts as appropriate. For every State Fiscal Year 20thereafter, the applicable period shall be the 12 months 21beginning July 1 and ending on June 30, to determine the tax 22amounts received which shall have deducted therefrom the 23certified Initial Sales Tax Amounts, Adjusted Initial Sales 24Tax Amounts or the Revised Initial Sales Tax Amounts. 25Municipalities intending to receive a distribution of State 26Sales Tax Increment must report a list of retailers to the   SB2896- 56 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1Department of Revenue by October 31, 1988 and by July 31, of 2each year thereafter.3    (t) "Taxing districts" means counties, townships, cities 4and incorporated towns and villages, school, road, park, 5sanitary, mosquito abatement, forest preserve, public health, 6fire protection, river conservancy, tuberculosis sanitarium 7and any other municipal corporations or districts with the 8power to levy taxes.9    (u) "Taxing districts' capital costs" means those costs of 10taxing districts for capital improvements that are found by 11the municipal corporate authorities to be necessary and 12directly result from the redevelopment project.13    (v) As used in subsection (a) of Section 11-74.4-3 of this 14Act, "vacant land" means any parcel or combination of parcels 15of real property without industrial, commercial, and 16residential buildings which has not been used for commercial 17agricultural purposes within 5 years prior to the designation 18of the redevelopment project area, unless the parcel is 19included in an industrial park conservation area or the parcel 20has been subdivided; provided that if the parcel was part of a 21larger tract that has been divided into 3 or more smaller 22tracts that were accepted for recording during the period from 231950 to 1990, then the parcel shall be deemed to have been 24subdivided, and all proceedings and actions of the 25municipality taken in that connection with respect to any 26previously approved or designated redevelopment project area   SB2896- 57 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1or amended redevelopment project area are hereby validated and 2hereby declared to be legally sufficient for all purposes of 3this Act. For purposes of this Section and only for land 4subject to the subdivision requirements of the Plat Act, land 5is subdivided when the original plat of the proposed 6Redevelopment Project Area or relevant portion thereof has 7been properly certified, acknowledged, approved, and recorded 8or filed in accordance with the Plat Act and a preliminary 9plat, if any, for any subsequent phases of the proposed 10Redevelopment Project Area or relevant portion thereof has 11been properly approved and filed in accordance with the 12applicable ordinance of the municipality.13    (w) "Annual Total Increment" means the sum of each 14municipality's annual Net Sales Tax Increment and each 15municipality's annual Net Utility Tax Increment. The ratio of 16the Annual Total Increment of each municipality to the Annual 17Total Increment for all municipalities, as most recently 18calculated by the Department, shall determine the proportional 19shares of the Illinois Tax Increment Fund to be distributed to 20each municipality.21    (x) "LEED certified" means any certification level of 22construction elements by a qualified Leadership in Energy and 23Environmental Design Accredited Professional as determined by 24the U.S. Green Building Council.25    (y) "Green Globes certified" means any certification level 26of construction elements by a qualified Green Globes   SB2896- 58 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1Professional as determined by the Green Building Initiative.2(Source: P.A. 102-627, eff. 8-27-21.) 3    Section 10. The River Conservancy Districts Act is amended 4by changing Section 11.5 as follows: 5    (70 ILCS 2105/11.5)6    Sec. 11.5. Public development projects. 7    (a) The board of trustees of a river conservancy district 8located in one or more counties may enter into lease 9agreements for the development of projects that are intended 10to enhance economic development, create jobs, and increase 11tourism (i) when the aggregate unemployment rate, as 12determined by the United States Department of Labor, for the 13county or counties served by the district exceeded 12% during 14any month of the first quarter of 1993 and (ii) in the case of 15a river conservancy district serving a county that is 16contiguous with 2 or more counties, when the aggregate 17unemployment rate for those contiguous counties exceeded 18% 18during any month of the first quarter of 1993. These projects 19include tourism development projects including, but not 20limited to, resorts, motels, and other related service and 21tourism development, built by private developers under the 22conditions set forth in this Section.23    (b) The board of trustees of a river conservancy district 24may enter into future agreements for the transfer of certain   SB2896- 59 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1lands between a State agency or agencies and a river 2conservancy district when (i) a basic agreement providing for 3the transfer of certain lands was entered into on or before 4January 1, 1993, between a State agency or agencies and a river 5conservancy district meeting the unemployment guidelines set 6forth in this Section and (ii) a river conservancy district 7obtains the land from a State agency or agencies for the 8purposes of economic development or job creation projects.9    (c) A board of trustees authorized to enter into lease 10agreements under the requirements of subsection (a) may lease 11land to a responsible person, firm, or corporation for a 12period not longer than 50 years for development as authorized 13in this Section and grant the person, firm, or corporation the 14option to extend the lease for subsequent periods not longer 15than 50 years.16    (d) A board of trustees authorized to enter into lease 17agreements under the requirements of subsection (a) shall take 18appropriate steps to insure that, within 5 years after the 19board enters into a lease agreement, (i) at least 50% of the 20land for the proposed development is available and developed 21for public use, and (ii) at least 50% of the buildings 22constructed for the proposed development are available for 23public use.24    (e) Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory Act 25of the 104th General Assembly, a redevelopment project area 26and any amendment adding one or more additional areas to any   SB2896- 60 -LRB104 16065 RTM 29341 b1existing redevelopment project area created under the Tax 2Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act of the Illinois 3Municipal Code may include areas within the Big Island River 4Conservancy District only if the municipality receives 5unanimous consent from both (1) the board of trustees of the 6Big Island River Conservancy District and (2) the joint review 7board created to review the proposed redevelopment project 8area and any proposed amendment of any existing redevelopment 9project area. 10(Source: P.A. 88-472.) 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.